Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Chapter 10 Wyoming Partnership Challenge Loan Program [Repealed]

§§ 9-10-101 and 9-10-102.
[Amended and Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §§

9-12-301

and

9-12-302

by Laws 1998, ch. 6, § 4.

§ 9-10-103.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 6, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1987, ch. 100, § 1, related to the science, technology and energy authority.

§§ 9-10-104 through 9-10-108.
[Amended and Renumbered.]

Amended and renumbered as §§

9-12-303

through

9-12-307

by Laws 1998, ch. 6, § 4.